Utah statutes.
76-10-1107.   Seizure and sale of devices or equipment used for gambling.

When any magistrate determines that any devices or equipment are being used or kept for the purpose of being used for gambling, the magistrate may authorize the county commissioner of the county where the seizure occurred, in conjunction with the sheriff, or if the seizure occurred within the limits of an incorporated city or town, may authorize its governing body, in conjunction with its chief law enforcement officer, to seize the devices or equipment and institute forfeiture proceedings in accordance with the procedures and substantive protections of Title 24, Chapter 1, Utah Uniform Forfeiture Procedures Act.

